Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 1. In General

§ 14-1-101.
Age of majority; rights on emancipation.

Upon becoming eighteen (18) years of age, an individual reaches the age of majority and as an adult acquires all rights and responsibilities granted or imposed by statute or common law, except as otherwise provided by law.

A minor may consent to health care treatment to the same extent as if he were an adult when any one (1) or more of the following circumstances apply:

The minor is or was legally married;

The minor is in the active military service of the United States;

The parents or guardian of the minor cannot with reasonable diligence be located and the minor’s need for health care treatment is sufficiently urgent to require immediate attention;

The minor is living apart from his parents or guardian and is managing his own affairs regardless of his source of income;

The minor is emancipated under W.S.

14-1-201

through

14-1-206

;

The minor is twelve (12) years of age or older, is a smoker or user of tobacco products and the health care to which the minor consents is a tobacco cessation program approved by the department of health pursuant to W.S.

9-4-1204

.

The consent given pursuant to subsection (b) of this section is not subject to disaffirmance because of minority.

Any competent adult may enter into a binding contract and shall be legally responsible therefor.

A person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age may consent to donate and may donate blood.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 14-1.1, 16-3; W.S. 1977, §§

14-1-101

,

16-3-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, ch. 26, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 1; 1986, ch. 20, § 1; 1989, ch. 207, § 2; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 198, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional prohibition against local or special laws declaring any person of age, see art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.

As to minority being legal disability staying statute of limitations, see §

1-3-114

.

As to ineligibility of person under the age of majority to serve as administrator, see §

2-4-203

.

As to preference for appointment of guardian of minor, see §

3-2-107

.

For definition of “adult,” see §

8-1-102

.

As to minimum marriageable age, see §

20-1-102

.

As to minimum age to register to vote, see §

22-3-102

.

As to exclusion of minors under 18 years of age from definition of “employee” for purposes of minimum wage law, see §

27-4-201

.

As to service of subpoena not being made by any person under the age of 18 years, see Rule 45(b), W.R.C.P.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “or” at the end of (b)(iii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “any one (1) or more of the following circumstances apply” at the end of the introductory language of (b); added (b)(vi); and made a minor stylistic change.

Prospective operation. —

Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 4, provides: “This act shall operate prospectively only and shall not apply to existing court decrees, trusts, wills or other written documents.”

Severability. —

Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 5, provides: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Amendment applies prospectively. —

The legislature intended for the change in the age of majority made in 1993 to apply prospectively and not to apply to an existing court decree such as a child support order in a divorce decree; the district court erred in modifying the child support orders to reflect the new age of majority. Thomas v. Thomas, 913 P.2d 854,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1996).

Trial court properly granted a father's request to reduce his child support obligation when his eldest son turned 18-years-old and properly denied the mother's request to apply Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-1-101

as it existed when the parties were divorced, which would have extended the father's obligation until the children were 19-years-old, as the original divorce decree and settlement agreement did not specify a child support obligation for either parent. Jordan v. Brackin, 2003 WY 151, 79 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2003).

Juvenile tried and sentenced as adult. —

Although son answered to criminal charges in district court, he remained a minor until he reached eighteen, the age of majority, and son's incarceration, standing alone, did not effect an emancipation; father was therefore not entitled to suspension or termination of his child support obligation. Garver v. Garver, 981 P.2d 471,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1999).

District court properly denied defendant's motion to correct an illegal sentence because he did not met his burden of proving that the statute under which he was sentence was cruel or unusual where he was 18 at the time he committed a double homicide, his sentence to two consecutive life sentences for first-degree murder was effectively a sentence of life without the possibility of parole, and the defining the age of majority as 19 did not do so for purposes of determining criminal culpability. Nicodemus v. State, 2017 WY 34, 392 P.3d 408,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2017).

Parent has duty to support incapacitated child

even though the child has reached the age of majority. Kamp v. Kamp, 640 P.2d 48,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1982).

Quoted

in

McArtor v. State, 699 P.2d 288,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 481

(Wyo. 1985); Daniel v. State, 923 P.2d 728,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1996); Bagley v. Bagley, 2013 WY 126, 311 P.3d 141,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 131

, 2013 WL 5593300 (Oct 11, 2013).

Cited

in

Jennings v. Jennings, 783 P.2d 178,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1989); KT v. State, 902 P.2d 1288,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part IV,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 155 (1975).

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Inclusion or exclusion of day of birth in determining attainment of majority, 5 ALR2d 1143.

Enlistment, or consent to enlistment, of minor in military service as emancipating him, 36 ALR2d 1018.

Right of parent to maintain tort action against child, 60 ALR2d 1284, 62 ALR3d 1299.

Federal or state law as controlling question of representation of infant, 68 ALR2d 752.

Allowance from incompetent's estate to children, 99 ALR2d 946, 24 ALR3d 863.

Power to lease, or to authorize lease of, infant's lands beyond minority of guardianship, 6 ALR3d 570.

Liability for prenatal injuries, 40 ALR3d 1222.

Right of minor to have abortion performed without parental consent, 42 ALR3d 1397.

Right of child or parent to recover for alienation of the other's affections, 60 ALR3d 931.

Death action by or in favor of parent against unemancipated child, 62 ALR3d 1299.

Power of parent to have mentally defective child sterilized, 74 ALR3d 1224.

Statutory change of age of majority as affecting preexisting status or rights, 75 ALR3d 228.

Modern trends as to contributory negligence of children, 32 ALR4th 56.

Parent's or relative's rights of visitation of adult against latter's wishes, 40 ALR4th 846.

Post-secondary education as within nondivorced parent's child-support obligation, 42 ALR4th 819.

Infant's liability for medical, dental or hospital services, 53 ALR4th 1249.

Statute protecting minors in a specified age range from rape or other sexual activity as applicable to defendant minor within protected age group, 18 ALR5th 856.

§ 14-1-102.
Right to contract.

An unemancipated minor may obtain a birth certificate from the department of health and may enter into a legally binding contract for housing, employment, purchase of a motor vehicle, receipt of a student loan, admission to postsecondary school, establishing a bank account, admission to a domestic violence or homeless shelter and receipt of services as a homeless youth or victim of domestic violence or sexual abuse, provided that the minor:

Meets all of the following:

At least sixteen (16) years of age;

Willingly living separate and apart from his parents who consent to or acquiesce in the separate living arrangement;

Homeless;

Managing his own financial affairs.

Submits a notarized affidavit in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

A notarized affidavit required under this section shall be:

Signed and sworn to by the minor which includes all of the following:

The minor’s full name;

The minor’s birth date;

A statement by the minor verifying the conditions listed in paragraph (a)(i) of this section;

A statement by the minor declaring that the information provided is true and correct under penalty of perjury.

Witnessed by two (2) or more adults. The acknowledgment by each adult witnessing the affidavit shall include a declaration that he is an attorney, health care provider, rabbi, priest, minister, clergy or other religious counselor or a college or school administrator or counselor and that to the best of his knowledge the minor signed the affidavit willingly and understands the nature and legal implications of the contract, if applicable. The affidavit shall require a rabbi, priest, minister, clergy or other religious counselor who witnesses an affidavit to verify under penalty of false swearing under W.S.

6-5-303

that the witness has not been convicted of a felony in this state or another jurisdiction. An adult witnessing an affidavit pursuant to this paragraph shall not assume any legal responsibility or liability under a contract entered into pursuant to this section.

A person that in good faith accepts an affidavit purportedly signed and sworn to in accordance with this section and who is without actual knowledge that the affidavit is fraudulent or otherwise invalid may rely upon the affidavit as if it were genuine and may enter into a contract that is legally binding upon the minor as provided under subsection (a) of this section.

For purposes of this section, “homeless” means as that term is defined in 42 U.S.C. section 11434a(2).

History.

2017 ch. 180, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 180, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.